District of Columbia statutes.
42-3671.07

Reinstatement.

(a)

A consumer who fails to make a timely rental payment may reinstate the agreement, without losing any rights or options which exist under the agreement, by the payment of:

(1)

All current and past due rental charges;

(2)

If the property has been picked up, the reasonable costs of pickup and redelivery; and

(3)

Any applicable late fee, within 5 days of the renewal date if the consumer pays monthly, or within 2 days of the renewal date if the consumer pays more frequently than monthly.

(b)

In the case of a consumer who has paid less than 2/3 of the total payments required to purchase under the lease-purchase agreement and who has returned, or voluntarily surrendered, the property, other than through judicial process, during the applicable reinstatement period set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the consumer may reinstate the agreement during a period of not less than 21 days after the date of the return of property.

(c)

In the case of a consumer who has paid at least 2/3 of the total of payments and has returned, or voluntarily surrendered, the property, other than through judicial process, during the applicable period set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the consumer may reinstate the agreement during a period of not less than 45 days after the date of the return of the property.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall prevent a lessor from attempting to repossess property during the reinstatement period, but repossession shall not affect the consumer’s right to reinstate. Upon reinstatement, the lessor shall provide the consumer with the same property or substitute property of comparable quality and condition.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-99, § 8, 49 DCR 1000
This section is referenced in § 42-3671.04.